Wyoming, session 2025, HB0135.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-34-101 is created to read:

CHAPTER 34
AUTOLOGOUS OR DIRECT BLOOD DONATIONS

35-34-101. Autologous or direct blood donations;
requirements.
HB0135

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0375

(a) For purposes of this section:

(i) "Autologous blood donation" means when a
person donates the person's own blood for personal use
during a future medical procedure;

(ii) "Direct blood donation" means when a person
donates the person's blood specifically for the use of
another person during the other person's future medical
procedure.

(b) A hospital or other health care facility licensed
under this title shall allow a person on whom a medical
procedure is to be performed at the facility to donate a
health care provider-ordered autologous or direct blood
donation before the medical procedure if the facility
performs blood donations.

(c) A blood bank that facilitates autologous or
direct blood donations shall comply with a health care
provider's order prescribing an autologous or direct blood
donation for a person, unless the person donating blood is
HB0135

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0375
in ill health, has a heart condition that makes donating
blood inadvisable, the person weighs too little to donate
blood, or the person cannot or should not donate blood for
any other reason.

(d) A blood bank may charge not more than their
regular fee to facilitate an autologous or direct blood
donation ordered by a health care provider under subsection
(c) of this section. The blood bank may charge a fee to
store the donated blood until it is used by the person
meant to receive it.

Section 2. The department of health shall promulgate
all rules necessary to implement this act.

HB0135

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0375
Section 3.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0135